Louisiana, session 2026, SB213.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:852.3 and 852.4(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§852.3. Certificate of title authorized
A. Any person who purchases or possesses either of the following any vessel
or outboard motor to be principally operated on the waters of this state and not held
as inventory for sale or lease may apply to the department for a certificate of title for
the following:.
(1) A vessel valued in excess of two thousand five hundred dollars and
required to be numbered and transferred for the first time on or after July 1, 2008.
(2) An outboard motor transferred for the first time on or after January 1,
2011.
B. Any vessel valued in excess of five thousand dollars and required to
be numbered or any outboard motor that is purchased or otherwise transferred
on or after January 1, 2027, shall be titled in accordance with this Part.
C. A person who is the owner of a vessel with a valid certificate of
documentation issued by the United States Coast Guard shall not be issued a
certificate of title.
§852.4. Application for certificate of title; form; content
A. An For vessels and outboard motors that are required to be titled
pursuant to R.S. 34:852.3(B), application for a certificate of title may shall be made
by the owner within sixty days after acquiring the vessel or outboard motor or after
a change in the data listed on the certificate of title. For all other vessels and
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 213 ENROLLED
outboard motors, the application for a certificate of title may be made by the
owner at any time. The application shall be on forms prescribed and furnished by
the department.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.